tests/shared_task.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "affirmative (long-vowel-final)":
    относительность<n><px1sg><dat> : относительностьпар
    уһул<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : устар
    вулкан<n><px1pl><nom> : вулкаммыт
    вулкан<n><px1pl><acc> : вулкаммытын
    вулкан<n><px1pl><com> : вулканмытыныын
    вулкан<n><px1pl><abl> : вулкаммытыттан
    гепатит<n><px2sg><nom> : гепатитыҥ
    иҥин<v><iv><past><p2><pl> : иҥнибиккит
    иҥин<v><iv><past><p2><sg> : иҥнибитиҥ
    иҥин<v><iv><past><p3><sg> : иҥнибитэ
    киоск<n><ins> : киосканан
    коран<n><px1sg><acc> : кораммын
    коран<n><px1sg><com> : кораммыныын
    коран<n><px1pl><par> : кораммытына
    коран<n><px1pl><comp> : кораммытынааҕар
    корреспондент<n><ins> : корреспонденынан
    корреспонден<n><px1pl><nom> : корреспондеммыт
    корреспонден<n><px1pl><par> : корреспондеммытына
    корреспонден<n><px1pl><abl> : корреспондеммытыттан
    латын<n><px1pl><acc> : латыммытын
    латын<n><px1pl><com> : латыммытыныын
    латын<n><px1pl><abl> : латыммытыттан
    оонньоо<v><tv><nec><p3><sg> : оонньуохтаах
    оонньоо<v><tv><nec><p1><pl> : оонньуохтаахпыт
    оонньоо<v><tv><nec><p3><pl> : оонньуохтаахтар
    ороскуот<n><px2sg><par> : ороскуоккына
    ороскуот<n><px2sg><com> : ороскуоккынын
    ороскуот<n><px2pl><acc> : ороскуоккытын
    ороскуот<n><px2pl><ins> : ороскуоккытынан
    ороскуот<n><px1sg><dat> : ороскуоппар
    ороскуот<n><px1pl><nom> : ороскуотум
    ороскуот<n><px1pl><dat> : ороскуоппытыгар
    ороскуот<n><px1pl><abl> : ороскуоппытыттан
    пароль<n><par> : парольда
    пиньинь<n><ins> : пиньининэн
    румын<n><px1pl><par> : румыммытына
    румын<n><px1pl><abl> : румыммытыттан
    спорт<n><comp> : спортааҕар
    уһун<v><iv><neg><imp><p2><sg> : устума
    уһун<v><iv><neg><ifi><p1><pl> : устубатыбыт
    уһун<v><iv><neg><ifi><p2><sg> : устубатыҥ
    шалфей<n><ins> : шалфейынан
    эргилин<v><iv><fut><p3><sg> : эргиллиэҕэ
    тон<n><px1pl><com> : [ томмутунуун, туоммутунуун ]
    автомобиль<n><px3sg><nom> : автомобилэ
    аптамабыыл<n><px3sg><nom> : аптамабыыла
    гол<n><nom> : гол
    гуол<n><nom> : гуол
    наследие<n><ins> : [ наследиянан, наследиенан ]
